North Carolina statutes. Chapter 127A. Militia.
Article 13. Armories.

§ 127A-161.
Definitions.

As used in this Article, the following terms mean:

Armory. — Any building or building complex and related facilities, including the lands for them, which are intended to be utilized by the militia for training, administration, storage, and the maintenance and servicing of equipment.

Armory site. — That land, meeting federal and State specifications, upon which an armory may be constructed.

Department. — The North Carolina Department of Public Safety.

Facilities. — Those adjuncts to an armory, including but not limited to yards, storage buildings, sheds, ramps, racks, target ranges, furniture, fixtures and other equipment and installations.

Funds. — Any monies appropriated by any municipality, county, the State or the United States government and made available for the purpose of acquiring armory sites or constructing or repairing any armory, warehouse, or other facility for the use of any unit or for any other purpose in connection with the housing, training, instruction or promotion of the interest of any unit.

Municipality. — Any incorporated city, town or village.

Unit. — Any organizational entity of the militia.

History.

1947, c. 1010, s. 1; 1973, c. 620, s. 9; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 1977, c. 70, s. 2; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g); 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(g), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Public Safety” for “Crime Control and Public Safety” in subdivision (3).

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, made minor punctuation changes throughout the section; and in subdivision (5), substituted “monies” for “moneys.”

§ 127A-162.
Authority to foster development of armories and facilities.

The Department of Public Safety is authorized and empowered to foster the development in North Carolina of adequate armories and other necessary facilities for the proper housing, instruction, training and administration of all units and facilities necessary for the proper protection, care, maintenance, repair, issue and upkeep of public and military property issued to or for the use of any unit.

History.

1947, c. 1010, s. 4; 1973, c. 620, s. 9; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 1977, c. 70, s. 2; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(g), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Public Safety” for “Crime Control and Public Safety.”

§ 127A-163.
Powers of Department specified.

The Department of Public Safety is further authorized and empowered:

To act as an agency of the State of North Carolina for the purpose of setting up and administering any statewide plan for the acquisition of armories and armory sites, for the construction and maintenance of armories and for providing facilities which are now or may be necessary in order to comply with any federal law and in order to receive, administer and disburse any funds which may be provided by act of Congress for such purpose;

When acting as an agency of the State of North Carolina under subdivision (1) of this section, to promulgate statewide plans for the acquisition of armories and armory sites, for the construction and maintenance of armories and other facilities that are desirable or necessary to meet the requirements and receive the benefits of any federal legislation with respect thereto;

To receive and administer any funds which may be appropriated by any act of Congress or otherwise for the acquisition of armories and armory sites, for the construction and maintenance of armories, and for providing facilities that may at any time become available for those purposes;

To receive and administer any other funds which may be available in furtherance of any activity in which the Department of Public Safety is authorized and empowered to engage under the provisions of this Article; and

To adopt rules to carry out the intent and purpose of this Article.

History.

1947, c. 1010, s. 5; 1973, c. 620, s. 9; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 1977, c. 70, s. 2; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g); 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(g), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Public Safety” for “Crime Control and Public Safety” in the introductory language and in subdivision (4).

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, in subdivision (2), substituted “When acting as an agency of the State of North Carolina under subdivision (1) of this section” for “As such agency of the State of North Carolina” and “other facilities that are desirable” for “such other facilities as may be found desirable”; in subdivision (3), substituted “those purposes” for “such purposes” and made minor stylistic changes; and in subdivision (5), substituted “To adopt rules” for “To adopt such rules and regulations as may be necessary.”

§ 127A-164.
Power to acquire land, make contracts, etc.

In furtherance of the duties, power, and authority given herein, the Department of Public Safety is authorized and empowered within the limitations of

G.S. 143-341

to accept and hold title to real property in the name of the State of North Carolina, and to enter in contracts and do any and all things necessary to carry out any statewide programs for the acquisition of armories and armory sites, the construction and maintenance of armories, and to provide facilities which may be considered by it as necessary for any unit and which may be authorized by act of Congress or otherwise.

History.

1947, c. 1010, s. 6; 1973, c. 620, s. 9; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 1977, c. 70, s. 2; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(g), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Public Safety” for “Crime Control and Public Safety.”

§ 127A-165.
Counties and municipalities may lease, convey or acquire property for use as armory.

Every municipality and county of the State of North Carolina is hereby authorized and empowered to lease or convey by deed to the State of North Carolina:

Any existing armory and the land adjacent thereto;

Any real property suitable for the construction of an armory, warehouse or other facility; and

Any real property suitable for use in the administration, instruction and training of any unit.

Every municipality and county is further authorized and empowered to acquire any real property which may be suitable for use as an armory or for the construction of an armory thereon, or for any other purpose of a unit. The contracting of an indebtedness and the expenditure of public funds by any municipality or county to comply with the provisions of this Article are hereby declared to be a necessary expense and for a public purpose.

History.

1947, c. 1010, s. 7; 1949, c. 1066, s. 1; 1975, c. 604, s. 2.

§ 127A-166.
Prior conveyances validated.

All conveyances of real property made before April 20, 1949, by any municipality or county of the State of North Carolina to the State of North Carolina for armory purposes are hereby validated and ratified in every respect.

History.

1949, c. 1066, s. 2; 1975, c. 604, s. 2.

§ 127A-167.
Appropriations to supplement available funds authorized.

Any city or town and any county in the State, separately or jointly, may make appropriations to supplement available federal or State funds to be used for the construction of armory facilities for the North Carolina National Guard. Appropriations made under authority of this Article shall be in the amounts and in the proportions deemed adequate and necessary by the governing body of the county and/or municipality desiring to participate in the armory construction program.

History.

1955, c. 1181, s. 1; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” at the end of the first sentence.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, substituted “shall be in the amounts and in the proportions deemed adequate” for “shall be in such amounts and in such proportions as may be deemed adequate” in the last sentence.

§ 127A-168.
Local financial support.

Each county and city in this State is authorized to make appropriations for the purposes of this Article and to fund them by levy of property taxes pursuant to

G.S. 153A-149

and

G.S. 160A-209

and by the allocation of other revenues whose use is not otherwise restricted by law.

History.

1955, c. 1181, s. 2; 1961, c. 1042; 1973, c. 803, s. 12; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, substituted “G.S. 160A-209” for “160A-209.”

§ 127A-169.
Unexpended portion of State appropriation.

The unexpended portion of any appropriation from the General Fund of the State for the purposes set out in this Article, or in Article 17 of this Chapter, remaining at the end of any biennium, shall not revert to the General Fund of the State, but shall constitute part of a permanent fund to be expended from time to time in the manner and for the purposes set out in this Article.

History.

1949, c. 1202, s. 2; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2011-195, s. 1(a); 2013-360, s. 36.11(f).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, twice substituted “General Fund” for “general fund.”

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 36.11(f), effective July 1, 2013, inserted “or in Article 17 of this Chapter.”

§§ 127A-170 through 127A-174.

Reserved for future codification purposes.